Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Missing Child Information Center

17.450.
Kentucky Missing Child Information Center.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall establish within the cabinet a “Kentucky Missing Child Information Center,” which shall serve as a central repository of and clearinghouse for information about Kentucky children believed to be missing and children from other states believed to be missing in Kentucky.

The cabinet shall provide the Missing Child Information Center with computer equipment and a computer program which shall list and be capable of immediately retrieving the name and complete description of any missing Kentucky child referred to in subsection (1) of this section.

The cabinet shall design the computer program so as to accept and generate complete information on a missing child, which information shall be retrievable by the child’s name and date of birth, Social Security number, fingerprint classification, any number of physical descriptions, including hair and eye color and body marks, and known associates and locations.

Only law enforcement agencies shall be authorized to order missing child information entered into or retrieved from the missing child information center computer, except that a parent or guardian may order from the Department of Kentucky State Police information on his or her child to be entered or retrieved when another law enforcement agency has refused to enter or retrieve such missing child information.

The cabinet, through the Kentucky Missing Child Information Center, shall regularly issue flyers containing physical and situational descriptions of missing children when requested by a law enforcement agency or when determined by the cabinet.

For purposes of this section, child shall mean any person under eighteen (18) years of age or any person certified or known to be mentally incompetent or disabled.

A complete written report shall be issued annually by the cabinet, which report shall include statistical information on the numbers of missing children entered on the computer and located and recommendations for more accurate and timely reports and better usage of the computer.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in conformance with this section which provide for the orderly receipt of missing child information and requests for retrieval of missing child information.

The Department of Kentucky State Police and each city, county, and urban-county police department and each sheriff’s office shall fingerprint children without charge on forms provided by the cabinet. The completed fingerprint forms shall be delivered to the child’s parent or guardian and no copy of the fingerprint form shall be retained by the police department or sheriff’s office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 2007, ch. 85, § 96, effective June 26, 2007.

17.460.
Procedure by law enforcement agency upon receipt of report of missing child — Transportation and return of child once located.

Upon notification by a parent, guardian, person exercising custodial control or supervision, or the authorized representative of the Department for Community Based Services of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services if the child is a ward of the state, that a child is missing, the law enforcement agency receiving notification shall immediately complete a missing person’s report in a form prescribed by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet which shall include information the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet deems necessary for the identification of the missing child, including the child’s physical description, last known location, and known associates.

Within twenty-four (24) hours after completion of the missing person’s report form, the law enforcement agency shall transmit the report for inclusion within the Kentucky Missing Child Information Center computer and shall cause the report to be entered into the National Crime Information Center computer.

Within twenty-four (24) hours thereafter, the law enforcement agency shall investigate the report, shall inform all appropriate law enforcement officers of the existence of the missing child report, and shall communicate the report to every other law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area.

Upon location of the missing child and verification of the National Crime Information Center entry, the law enforcement agency shall transport the child to the parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision.

If the child is a ward of the state, the law enforcement agency shall transport the child to the authorized representative of the Department for Community Based Services of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency.

If the law enforcement agency is unable to return the child to the appropriate caretaker pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall contact the court-designated worker with jurisdiction for placement determination.

If the child is in custody on a charge of committing an offense pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the law enforcement agency shall proceed according to the provisions therein.

Within twenty-four (24) hours after a missing child is located and returned to the appropriate caretaker pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the law enforcement agency which transported, found, or returned the missing child shall notify both the Missing Child Information Center and the National Crime Information Center of that fact.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 414, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 75, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 93, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 97, effective June 26, 2007.

17.470.
Notification by Department of Kentucky State Police of missing and recovered children.

Upon receipt of a report of a missing child who was born in the Commonwealth, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall notify within forty-eight (48) hours the state registrar of vital statistics for the Commonwealth of the disappearance of such child and shall provide to the state registrar identifying information about the missing child. Upon learning of the recovery of a missing child, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall notify the state registrar.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide the commissioner of education with a list of the names of all missing children and children who have been recovered along with, if available, the last known school of enrollment. The commissioner of education shall provide the information to schools as required in KRS

156.495

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 27, § 2, effective March 2, 1992; 2003, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 98, effective June 26, 2007.